Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 7. Active State Duty.

§ 33-7-301.
Ordering organized militia into active state duty.

The Governor shall have power in case of invasion, disaster, insurrection, riot, breach of the peace, or combination to oppose the enforcement of the law by force or violence, or imminent danger thereof or other grave emergency, to order into the active service of the state for such period, to such extent and in such manner as he may deem necessary, all or any part of the organized militia. Such power shall include the power to order the organized militia or any part thereof to function under the operational control of the United States army, navy, or air force commander in charge of the defense of any area within the state which is invaded or attacked or is or may be threatened with invasion or attack.

Whenever any circuit judge of a county, sheriff, or mayor of a municipality, whose authority shall rank in the order named, shall apprehend the outbreak of insurrection, riot, breach of the peace, or combination to oppose the enforcement of the law by force or violence within the jurisdiction of which such officer is by law the conservator of the peace, or in the event of disaster or other grave emergency, it shall forthwith become the duty of the circuit judge, sheriff or mayor, when it appears that such unlawful combination or disaster has progressed beyond the control of the civil authorities, to notify the Governor, and the Governor may then, in his discretion, if he deems the apprehension well-founded or the disaster or emergency of sufficient magnitude, order into the active service of the state, for such period, to such extent, and in such manner as he may deem necessary, all or any part of the organized militia.

When the Governor orders into the active service of the state all or any portion of the organized militia as herein provided, he shall declare a state of emergency in such locality and it shall be the duty of the Governor to confirm such declaration and order in writing which shall state the area into which said force of the organized militia has been ordered.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-81; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 52, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-303.
Power of Governor to declare martial law.

The Governor, if he deems it necessary to preserve law and order, may by proclamation declare martial law to be in effect in any county or area in the state. Such proclamation shall be in writing, shall define the limits of such martial law, and specify the forces to be used, and the extent and degree to which martial law may be employed.

Nothing in this section or in any other statute shall be construed to confer upon the Governor or any official or employee of any department, agency or political subdivision of the state the power to:

Confiscate or seize a firearm, ammunition, or components of firearms or ammunition from a person who is in lawful possession of such firearm, ammunition, or components of ammunition; or

Impose additional restrictions as to the lawful possession, transfer, sale, carrying, storage, display or use of firearms, ammunition, or components of firearms or ammunition.

For the purposes of this subsection:

“Ammunition” means a cartridge, shell or other device containing explosive or incendiary material designed and intended for use in a firearm.

“Firearm” means any weapon which will or is designed to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-82; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 53; Laws, 2014, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 33-7-305.
National Guard; duty when ordered out.

It shall be the duty of the Governor, when ordering out any portion of the National Guard, for active state duty, to issue his orders to the officer in command of such troops as he may have ordered out, directing him as to the duty to be performed and the kind and extent of force to be used in the performance of such duty, and if the troops are so ordered out for the purpose of aiding the civil authorities, he shall designate in his order the civil authorities, if any, to be consulted by the commander of the troops and to what extent the troops will cooperate with or take orders from the civil authorities. When an armed military force is ordered out in aid of civil authorities, the orders of the civil officer or officers shall not extend beyond a direction of the general or specific objects to be accomplished. The tactical direction of the troops, the kind and extent of the force to be used, and the particular means to be employed are left solely with the military officers, subject to the orders received from the commander in chief.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-83; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 54, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-307.
Authority to close establishments.

Whenever any part of the military forces of this state is on active duty pursuant to the order of the Governor, the commanding officer may order the closing of any place where intoxicating liquors, arms, ammunition, dynamite or other explosives are sold, and forbid the sale, barter, loan or the giving away of these articles so long as any of the troops remain on duty in the vicinity where the place ordered closed may be located.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-84; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 55, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-309.
Control of unlawful assemblies.

Before using military forces in the dispersion of any riot, tumult, mob, or other lawless or unlawful assembly, or combination mentioned in this chapter, it shall be the duty of the civil officer calling out such military force, or some other conservator of the peace, of if none be present, then of the officer in command of the troops, or some person by him deputed to command persons composing such riotous, tumultuous, or unlawful assemblage or mob, to disperse and retire peacefully to their respective abodes and businesses; but, in no case, shall it be necessary to use any set or particular form or words in ordering the dispersion of any riotous, tumultuous or unlawful assembly; nor shall any such command be necessary where the officer or person, in order to give it, would necessarily be put in imminent danger of loss of life, or great bodily harm, or where such unlawful assembly or riot is engaged in the commission or perpetration of any forcible and atrocious felony, or in assaulting or attacking any civil officer, or person lawfully called to aid in the preservation of the peace, or is otherwise engaged in actual violence to any person or property.

Any person or persons, composing or taking part in any riot, tumult, mob or lawless combination or assembly, mentioned in this chapter, who, after being duly commanded to disperse as hereinbefore provided in this section, wilfully and intentionally fails to do so, is guilty of a felony, and must, on conviction, be imprisoned in the penitentiary for not less than one (1), nor more than two (2) years.

Any person who unlawfully assaults or fires at, or throws any missile at, against, or upon any member or body of the militia or National Guard, or civil officer, or other person lawfully aiding them, when assembling or assembled for the purpose of performing any duty under the provision of this section, must, on conviction, be imprisoned in the penitentiary for not less than two (2) years, nor more than five (5) years.

If any portion of the militia or National Guard, or person lawfully aiding them in the performance of any duty under the provisions of this section, are assaulted, attacked, or are in imminent danger thereof, the commanding officer of such militia or National Guard need not await any orders from any civil magistrate, but may at once proceed to quell such attack, and take all other needful steps for the safety of his command.

Whenever any shot is fired, or missile thrown, at or upon any body of the National Guard or militia in the performance of any duty under the provisions of this section it shall forthwith be the duty of every person in the assemblage from which the shot is fired, or missile thrown, immediately to disperse or retire therefrom, without awaiting orders to do so. Any person knowing or having reason to believe that a shot has been fired, or missile thrown, from any assemblage of which such person forms a part, or where he is present, and failing, without lawful excuse to retire immediately from such assemblage, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and must on conviction be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than one (1) month, nor more than one (1) year, and any person so remaining in such assemblage after being duly commanded to disperse, is guilty of a felony, and must, on conviction, be imprisoned in the penitentiary for not less than one (1) year, nor more than two (2) years.

Any commander of any military forces of the state engaged in dispersing any mob, or persons engaged in riot or tumult, may place any person or persons in the immediate vicinity of such mob or persons in protective custody and remove them to and hold them at any military installation within the state for a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours. However, all such persons shall at their request at the end of such forty-eight (48) hour period be returned to any city or town within the county from which removed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-85; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 56, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-311.
Exemption from liability.

No member of the militia ordered into the active service of the state, or ordered into any Title 32 United States Code capacity for service during a period of declared emergency under the Mississippi Emergency Management Law, Section 33-15-1 et seq., shall be liable civilly or criminally for any act or omission done, or caused, ordered or directed to be done, by him in furtherance of and while in the performance of his military duty. When an action or proceeding of any nature shall be commenced in any court by any person against any officer or enlisted man of the militia for any act so done, or caused, ordered or directed to be done, all the attorneys’ fees, expenses of the defense of such proceeding or action, civil or criminal, including fees of witnesses for the defense, defendant’s court costs, and all costs for transcripts of records and abstract, thereof on appeal, shall be paid by the state, out of the Military Fund. It shall be the duty of the Attorney General, either personally or by one or more assistants, to defend the officer or enlisted man. Where the action or proceeding is criminal, the Adjutant General shall designate a judge advocate of the National Guard or other authorized state military or naval forces to conduct the defense of such member, or if the services of a judge advocate are not available, then he shall select some other competent attorney to conduct such defense, and the judge advocate or other attorney so selected shall receive and be paid out of the Military Fund a reasonable compensation for his professional services. In any such action or proceeding, the defendant may require the person instituting or prosecuting the same to file security for payment of all costs, which costs if recovered in action, the costs whereof have been paid out of the Military Fund, shall be paid into the State Treasury for the benefit of the Military Fund. In any such suit against a member of the militia of this state, such member shall be entitled to have the venue changed to the appropriate court of his county of residence. In any such suit against two (2) or more members of the militia of this state, each of them shall be entitled to a severance. The immunities granted in this section are in addition to any other immunities conferred upon the militia by any other law, and nothing in this section shall abrogate or repeal any other such immunities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-86; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 57; Laws, 2015, ch. 385, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 33-7-313.
National Guard; pay; active state duty.

Whenever the National Guard, or any part thereof, is called out to aid civil authorities or to supersede same, or for any other active state duty, the officers, warrant officers and enlisted men of such force shall receive the same pay and allowances as officers, warrant officers and enlisted men of like grades and length of service in the Armed Forces of the United States. However, no one called out for such service shall receive less than Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day in addition to their allowances.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-87; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 58; Laws, 1974, ch. 309, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 27, 1974).

§ 33-7-315.
Expenses for active state duty.

Whenever the National Guard, or any part thereof, is ordered out for active state duty, all expenses incurred in such service shall be paid from funds of the State of Mississippi not otherwise appropriated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-88; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 59, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-316.
Mississippi National Guard State Active Duty Emergency Operations Fund created.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Mississippi National Guard State Active Duty Emergency Operations Fund” for the purpose of receiving monies appropriated or otherwise made available in any manner for deposit into the fund for maintaining annual general fund budget restrictions and enabling the Mississippi Military Department to respond to domestic events as directed by the Governor during declared states of emergency or in conjunction with approved emergency management assistance compacts. Monies in the special fund may be expended by the Mississippi Military Department, upon appropriation by the Legislature. Unexpended amounts remaining in such special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in such special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund. No state general funds shall be deposited into the special fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 433, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 33-7-317.
Duty to maintain militia.

The duty of governing and maintaining the National Guard of Mississippi not in the service of the United States rests upon the state, subject to the constitutional authority of congress.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-91; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 61, eff from and after June 1, 1966.